Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5356.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 23-15-10 of the General Laws in Chapter 23-15 entitled
"Determination of Need for New Healthcare Equipment and New Institutional Health Services" is
hereby amended to read as follows:
23-15-10. Application fees.
The state agency shall require that any applicant for certificate of need submit an
application fee prior to requesting any review of matters pursuant to the requirements of this
chapter; except that health care facilities owned and operated by the state of Rhode Island shall be
exempt from this application fee requirement. The application fee shall be paid by check made
payable to the general treasurer. Except for applications that propose new or expanded tertiary or
specialty care services as defined in subdivision 23-15-2(10)(vi), submission of any application
filed in accordance with § 23-15-4(d) shall include an application fee of five hundred dollars ($500)
per application plus an amount equal to one quarter of one percent (0.25%) of the total capital
expenditure costs associated with the application. For an application filed in accordance with the
requirements of § 23-15-5 (Expeditious review), the application shall include an application
processing fee of seven hundred and fifty dollars ($750) per application plus an amount equal to
one quarter of one percent (0.25%) of the total capital expenditure costs associated with the
application. Applications that propose new or expanded tertiary or specialty care services as defined
in subdivision 23-15-2(10)(vi), shall include an application fee of ten thousand dollars ($10,000)

plus an amount equal to one quarter of one percent (0.25%) of the total capital expenditure costs
associated with the application, which shall be limited to a total of twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000). Application fees shall be non-refundable. All fees received pursuant to this chapter shall
be deposited in the general fund.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001036
========
LC001036 - Page 2 of 3